Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.155.030

Industry partners—Freedom from discrimination.

When determining industry partners, the joint center for aerospace technology innovation shall ensure aerospace firms and aerospace industry associations adhere to the values of the state of Washington under RCW 49.60.030, which provide its citizens freedom from discrimination. Any relationship with a potential or current industry partner that is found to have violated RCW 49.60.030 by the attorney general shall not be considered and immediately terminated unless:

(1) The industry partner has fulfilled the conditions or obligations associated with any court order or settlement resulting from that violation; or

(2) The industry partner has taken significant and meaningful steps to correct the violation, as determined by the Washington state human rights commission.

[ 2020 c 306 s 3.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.